src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-norm.yaml
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: nigookookohoonsibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt+4: gigookookohoonyibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonyibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonyibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+4: gigookookohoonsibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonsibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonsibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt+4: ogookookohoonyibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonyibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonyibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+4: ogookookohoonsibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonsibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonsibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt+4: igookookohoonyibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: igookookohoonyibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: igookookohoonyibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+4: igookookohoonsibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: igookookohoonsibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: igookookohoonsibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nigookookohoomishinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gigookookohoomishinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gigookookohoomishiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4: ogookookohoomishini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: ogookookohoomishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt: nigookookohoomishiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoomishidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt: gigookookohoomishiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoomishidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt: ogookookohoomishiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoomishidig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Prt: igookookohoomishiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: igookookohoomishidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+4: nigookookohoomishan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: nigookookohoomishing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: nigookookohoomishag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+4: gigookookohoomishan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: gigookookohoomishing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: gigookookohoomishag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+4: ogookookohoomishan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: ogookookohoomishing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: ogookookohoomishag
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+4: igookookohoomishan
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: igookookohoomishing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: igookookohoomishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: nigookookohoominaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoominaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoominaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoominaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: gigookookohoomiwaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoomiwaadig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Prt: ogookookohoominiiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoominiidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: ogookookohoomiwaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoomiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+4: nigookookohoominaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoominaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoominaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+4: gigookookohoominaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoominaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoominaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+4: gigookookohoomiwaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoomiwaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoomiwaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+4: ogookookohoominiwa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Loc: ogookookohoominiing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+4+Pl: ogookookohoominiwa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+4: ogookookohoomiwaan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoomiwaang
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoomiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+4: nigookookohoomibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: nigookookohoomibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: nigookookohoomibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+4: gigookookohoomibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoomibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoomibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+4: ogookookohoomibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoomibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoomibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+4: igookookohoomibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: igookookohoomibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: igookookohoomibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nigookookohooshinaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nigookookohooshinaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gigookookohooshinaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohooshinaanidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: gigookookohooshiwaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gigookookohooshiwaadig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt: ogookookohooshiniiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: ogookookohooshiniidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: ogookookohooshiwaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: ogookookohooshiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: nigookookohooshinaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nigookookohooshinaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nigookookohooshinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: gigookookohooshinaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gigookookohooshinaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gigookookohooshinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+4: gigookookohooshiwaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: gigookookohooshiwaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: gigookookohooshiwaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+4: ogookookohooshiniwa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Loc: ogookookohooshiniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+4+Pl: ogookookohooshiniwa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+4: ogookookohooshiwaan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: ogookookohooshiwaang
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: ogookookohooshiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+4: nigookookohooshibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: nigookookohooshibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: nigookookohooshibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+4: gigookookohooshibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: gigookookohooshibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: gigookookohooshibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+4: ogookookohooshibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: ogookookohooshibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: ogookookohooshibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+4: igookookohooshibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: igookookohooshibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: igookookohooshibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: nigookookohoonaanibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nigookookohoonaanibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nigookookohoonaanibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nigookookohoonaanidigan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoonaanidiging
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoonaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoonaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoonaanidigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonaanidiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoowaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoowaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoowaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoowaadigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoowaadiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoowaadigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4+Prt+4: ogookookohooniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4+Prt+Loc: ogookookohooniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4+Prt+Pl: ogookookohooniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohooniidigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohooniidiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohooniidigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Prt+4: ogookookohoowaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoowaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoowaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoowaadigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoowaadiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoowaadigag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: gookookohoonyishibaniin
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookohoonyishibaniing
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: gookookohoonyishibaniig
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: gookookohoonsishibaniin
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: gookookohoonsishibaniing
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: gookookohoonsishibaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nigookookohoonyimishinaan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: nigookookohoonsimishinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishiwaa
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4: ogookookohoonyimishini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4: ogookookohoonsimishini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: nigookookohoonyimishiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoonyimishidig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: nigookookohoonsimishiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nigookookohoonsimishidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: gigookookohoonyimishiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishidig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: gigookookohoonsimishiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: ogookookohoonyimishiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishidig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: ogookookohoonsimishiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishidig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: igookookohoonyimishiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: igookookohoonyimishidig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: igookookohoonsimishiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: igookookohoonsimishidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: nigookookohoonyimishan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: nigookookohoonyimishing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: nigookookohoonyimishag
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: nigookookohoonsimishan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: nigookookohoonsimishing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: nigookookohoonsimishag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: gigookookohoonyimishan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: gigookookohoonsimishan
